Hawaii statutes.
§155-2 Objectives. One of the
objectives of the department of agriculture shall be to promote the
agricultural development of the State by stimulating, facilitating, and
granting loans to qualified farmers and food manufacturers.

The department shall encourage the growth,
development, and well-being of agriculture in the State by:

(1) Maximizing the use of limited state funds and
resources in encouraging development of new farmers and new crops;

(2) Assisting qualified farmers and food
manufacturers with loans;

(3) Encouraging private lenders to make loans to
qualified farmers and food manufacturers directly, or in cooperation, or in
participation with the State; and

(4) Providing relief to farmers in times of
emergencies.

The department shall also establish standards
and criteria pursuant to which loans may be provided to qualified farmers and
food manufacturers who cannot secure credit from other sources at reasonable
rates and terms. Any assessment of the program shall consider its purpose and intent
that involves credit risk beyond that of banks and other private lenders, and
the assessment shall be based on standards of similar programs. [L 1959, c 278,
pt of §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §25; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §102-3; HRS
§155-2; am L 1979, c 222, §2; am L 2000, c 51, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next